Indiana, session 2026, SB12.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-2.1-87.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 87.5. "Ranked choice voting"
refers to a system of voting that:
(1) allows a voter to rank to each candidate on a ballot for a
particular office in an order of preference; and
(2) tabulates each ballot in multiple rounds following the
elimination of a candidate;
until a single candidate receives a majority of the votes cast.
SECTION 2. IC 3-5-4-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The following apply to an election conducted
under this title:
(1) An election may not be determined by ranked choice
voting.
(2) A candidate may not be nominated for or elected to an
office by means of ranked choice voting.
SEA 12

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 12